District of Columbia statutes.
42-509

Reversions.

A reversion is the residue of an estate left in the grantor who has conveyed, or in the heirs of the devisor who has devised a particular estate less than his own, and which residue returns to his or their possession on the expiration of the particular estate.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1019

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-209.
1973 Ed., § 45-809.